New York, session 2025-2026, S865.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The family court act is amended by adding a new section 2 381.4 to read as follows: 3 § 381.4. Prohibition of public officials to unseal police records. 4 Unless authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction, the release by 5 an appointed or elected public official or an employee who is a caretak- 6 er of juvenile offender records or other court records that have been 7 sealed pursuant to this article is prohibited. 8 § 2. Section 195.00 of the penal law is amended by adding a new subdi- 9 vision 3 to read as follows: 10 3. They are an appointed or elected public official or a public 11 employee who is the caretaker of juvenile offender records or other 12 court records that have been sealed pursuant to law, and they knowingly 13 release such sealed juvenile offender records or other court records 14 without authorization by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 16 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02124-01-5